Arkansas, session 2025, HB1915.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-76-115 is amended to read as follows:
20-76-115. Resource limits for Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
Program — Resource limit Broad-based categorical eligibility waiver.
(a) Unless required by federal law, the Department of Human Services
shall not:
(1) Apply gross income standards for food assistance higher than
the standards specified in 7 U.S.C. § 2014(c); or
(2) Grant categorical eligibility that exempts households from
*CRH305*
03/31/2025 10:27:28 AM CRH305

HB1915
the gross income standard under subdivision (a)(1) of this section for any
noncash, in-kind, or other benefit unless under a broad-based categorical
eligibility waiver is obtained under subsection (b) of this section.
(b)(1)(A) The Department of Human Services shall request a broad-based
categorical eligibility waiver from the United States Department of
Agriculture to exempt Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program applicants
and enrollees from the federal resource limit, subject to the asset limits
under subdivision (b)(2) of this section.
(B) The Department of Human Services may request a broad-
based categorical eligibility waiver from the United States Department of
Agriculture if a waiver is necessary to implement the asset limits under
subdivision (b)(2) of this section.
(2)(c)(1) Upon the Department of Human Services obtaining the
broad-based categorical eligibility waiver requested under subdivision (b)(1)
of this section:,
(A) The the asset limit under the Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program shall be equal to the federal resource limit; six thousand
dollars ($6,000).
(2) The asset limit under subdivision (c)(1) of this section
shall be automatically adjusted for inflation on a biennial basis.
(B)(i) If an enrolled household is determined by the
Department of Human Services to have accumulated countable assets greater
than the federal resource limit, the Department of Human Services shall grant
a temporary increase of the asset limit for that household to an amount set
by the Department of Human Services by rule for a period of up to one (1)
year.
(ii) The Department of Human Services shall set the
temporary asset limit at five thousand five hundred dollars ($5,500) and may
seek waiver approval from the United States Department of Agriculture to
modify that amount to correspond with future changes in the federal resource
limit; and
(C) An enrolled household may receive a temporary increase
of the asset limit no more than one (1) time every five (5) years.



03/31/2025 10:27:28 AM CRH305